Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1295DP.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1295DP (1) 91
cm/ns

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 23.7, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
1. The board shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A
providing for the timing, form, content, and means by which any
aggrieved person, any taxpayer to or citizen of this state, the
attorney general, or any county attorney may file a complaint
with the board alleging a violation of chapter 21 or 22. The
complaint must be filed within sixty ninety days from the time
the alleged violation occurred or the complainant could have
become aware of the violation with reasonable diligence. All
complaints filed with the board shall be public records.